Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-502
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Information Technology Infrastructure Act, the definitions found in sections 86-503 to 86-510 apply.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1191;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 272;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 60.
July 1, 2026